Florida, session 2026, SB1258.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âPresent subsection (6) of section 316.85, 21 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (7), 22 respectively, and a new subsection (6) is added to that section, 23 to read: 24 316.85âAutonomous vehicles; operation; compliance with 25 traffic and motor vehicle laws; testing.â 26 (6)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an 27 autonomous vehicle may not be used to deliver commercial goods 28 directly to a residence or business for use or retail sale 29 unless a licensed human operator is physically present in the 30 autonomous vehicle. 31 Section 2.â(1)âBy January 1, 2031, or 5 years after the 32 commencement of any use of autonomous vehicles to deliver 33 commercial goods directly to a residence or business for use or 34 retail sale, whichever occurs later, the Department of Highway 35 Safety and Motor Vehicles shall submit to the President of the 36 Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives a report 37 evaluating the use of such autonomous vehicle technology and its 38 impact on public safety and employment in the transportation 39 sector. 40 (2)âThe report must include all of the following: 41 (a)âA summary of disengagements of autonomous vehicle 42 technology, related vehicle crashes, and any other information 43 the department deems relevant. 44 (b)âA recommendation on whether the Legislature should 45 remove, amend, or maintain the requirement in s. 316.85(6), 46 Florida Statutes, that licensed human operators be physically 47 present in autonomous vehicles used to deliver commercial goods 48 directly to a residence or business for use or retail sale. 49 (3)âIn preparing the report under subsection (2), the 50 department shall consult with all of the following: 51 (a)âThe Florida Highway Patrol regarding traffic impacts, 52 driver and passenger safety risks, and impacts on other 53 motorists, bicyclists, and pedestrians. 54 (b)âThe Department of Commerce regarding job-related 55 impacts, including any worker displacement and shortcomings in 56 retraining opportunities. 57 (c)âThe Department of Transportation regarding 58 infrastructure impacts, deficiencies, and needs. 59 (d)âIndependent experts regarding the performance of 60 autonomous vehicle technology, public safety impacts, and any 61 other relevant factors in considering the deployment of such 62 technology. 63 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.